Utah statutes.
53A-17a-147.   Use of funds for approved programs -- Assessment of funded programs.

(1)  Funds appropriated under this chapter shall only be used for programs approved by the State Board of Education.

(2)  The State Board of Education shall assess the progress and degree of effectiveness of all programs funded under this chapter.

